Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,160
Refusal or denial of application;
notice; appeal.

Written notice shall be delivered to any
applicant whose application for a commercial driver's license or CLP-commercial learner's permit is refused
or denied for cause. The applicant shall have a right to an immediate appeal
to the director upon receipt of such notice. The director shall hear the appeal
and render a prompt finding not later than ten days after receipt of the appeal.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 110;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 46.